Vermont, session 2025-2026, S31.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. TEMPORARY SUSPENSION OF AMBULANCE AGENCY
PROVIDER TAX; TRANSFERS FROM PILOT SPECIAL FUND
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of 33 V.S.A. § 1959 to the contrary, for
fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028, the Department of Vermont Health Access
shall not assess, and no ambulance agency shall be required to pay, the
ambulance agency assessment established by 33 V.S.A. § 1959.
VT LEG #380174 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.31
2025 Page 2 of 2
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of 32 V.S.A. § 3709 to the contrary, in
fiscal years 2026, 2027, and 2028, the Commissioner of Finance and
Management shall transfer from the PILOT Special Fund to the General Fund
an amount equal to the amount of revenue generated by the ambulance agency
assessment in fiscal year 2025 in order to replace approximately the amounts
that would otherwise have been available in the General Fund as a result of the
revenue generated by the ambulance agency assessment in each of those years.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380174 v.1